California statutes. Water Code
(d) The delinquent fees set forth in the report as confirmed shall constitute special assessments against the respective parcels of land and are a lien on the property for the amount of such delinquent fees. A certified copy of the confirmed report shall be filed with the county auditor for the amounts of the respective assessments against the respective parcels of land as they appear on the current assessment roll. The lien created attaches upon recordation, in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is situated, of a certified copy of the resolution of confirmation. The assessment may be collected at the same time and in the same manner as ordinary county ad valorem property taxes are collected and shall be subject to the same penalties and the same procedure and sale in case of delinquency as provided for such taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of county ad valorem property taxes shall be applicable to such assessment, except that if any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of such taxes would become delinquent, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the delinquency fees, as confirmed, relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

This remedy is in addition to all other means available for collection.

If the district is governed by a board of directors, this section shall only apply to such district if the board of supervisors consents to collect the delinquent fees in the manner prescribed herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 874, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

55501.5.

A district may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix a water service standby or immediate availability charge to be applied on an area or frontage or parcel basis, or a combination thereof, within the district to be charged to areas to which water service is made available for any purpose by the district, whether the water service is actually used or not. The district may establish schedules varying the charge according to the land uses and the degree of availability or quantity of use of the water service to the affected lands, and may restrict the charge to lands lying within one or more zones or areas of benefits established within the district. The district may not, however, except as is otherwise provided in this section, fix a charge in excess of thirty dollars ($30) per acre or for a parcel of less than one acre, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby or availability charge was established were followed, the district may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

The maximum charge which may be fixed by the district may be increased from one fiscal year to the next by the same percentage increase as reflected by the Consumer Price Index, as issued by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, relative to the immediately preceding fiscal year.

If a person for more than one year obtains substantially all of his or her water requirements for the contiguous parcels of land which the person occupies from rainfall, springs, streams, lakes, rivers or wells, and if the person’s primary economic activity on the land is the commercial extraction or processing of minerals, the land is exempt from any water standby or availability charges.

The district may collect the standby or availability charge by billing the charged lands on a fiscal year basis or by other means available.

The district may collect the standby or availability charge as a part of the annual general county tax bill if the district furnishes in writing to the board of supervisors and to the county auditor the description of each parcel for which a charge is to be billed, together with the amount of the charge applicable to each parcel, in sufficient time to meet the schedule established by the county for inclusion of those items on the county general tax bill. The parcel description may be the parcel number assigned by the county assessor to the parcel. In that case, the standby or availability charge is a lien against the parcel of land to which it is charged in the same manner as the county general taxes. Penalties may be collected for late payment of the standby or availability charge, or the amount thereof unpaid, in the manner and at the same rates as that applicable for late payment or the amount thereof unpaid of county general taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of municipal ad valorem taxes are applicable to those charges, except that, if any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of the taxes would become delinquent, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to the real property and the charge relating to the property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

If the district collects standby charges through the county general tax bill, the amount of the standby charge and any applicable penalty shall be stated on the tax bill separately from all other taxes, if practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

55502.

The receipts from the rates or charges may also be used to reduce the principal or interest of any bonded indebtedness that the waterworks district may have.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55502.1.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the board may establish and include in the annual budget for a district a general unappropriated reserve not to exceed 25 percent of the total appropriations contained in the budget, exclusive of all items for bond interest and redemption, the general unappropriated reserve, and the general reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

55503.

The board may borrow funds from the county, other waterworks districts, and, where the district is a subsidiary district, the city, not to exceed 85 percent of the district’s anticipated revenue for the fiscal year in which they are borrowed or for the next ensuing fiscal year. In levying taxes as authorized by this division, the board may raise sufficient revenues to repay such loans.

The board may lend available district funds to another waterworks district, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the board from borrowing such funds from banks or other financial institutions when the best interests of the district are served thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55503.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, such funds, when so borrowed by a waterworks district, shall forthwith increase the appropriations of the district for which they are needed. The governing body of the entity from which the funds are borrowed may specify the date and manner in which the funds shall be repaid. In no case shall repayment of the loan be deferred longer than 10 calendar years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55503.6.

The district shall pay interest on all funds borrowed from the county, at the same rate that the county applies to funds of the district on deposit with the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55504.

Where a district has an assessed valuation of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the board of supervisors of the county may loan county funds, in a sum not in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), to the district to be used for the purpose of repairing, improving, extending or renewing the district water system, to be returned to the county by the district from revenues and taxes of the district during the period of 10 years following the date of the loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 365.)
-------------------------------------------

55505.

The board may by resolution establish a revolving fund for any officer or employee of the district in the same manner revolving funds for county officers are established by the board of supervisors of a county pursuant to Sections 29321 to 29330, inclusive, of the Government Code and for such purpose the term “board of supervisors” shall mean the board. Any revolving fund so established shall be limited to the uses and expenditures applicable to revolving funds for county officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

55506.

Any money belonging to the district or paid into the county treasury to the credit of the district may be deposited by the officer of the district who has legal custody of the money, in accordance with the general laws governing the deposit of public money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55507.

A district may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix a sewer service standby or immediate availability charge to be applied on a parcel basis within the district to be charged to the parcels to which sewer service is made available by the district, whether the sewer service is actually used or not. The district may establish schedules for the charge, and may restrict the charge to lands lying within one or more zones or areas of benefits established within the district. The district may not, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), fix a charge in excess of thirty dollars ($30) a year for a residential parcel. Commercial or other parcels shall be charged according to equivalent residential parcels, but shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby or availability charge was established were followed, the district may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

The district may collect the standby or availability charge by billing the charged lands on a fiscal year basis or by other means available.

The district may collect the standby or availability charge as a part of the annual general county tax bill if the district furnishes in writing to the board of supervisors and to the county auditor the description of each parcel for which a charge is to be billed, together with the amount of the charge applicable to each parcel, in sufficient time to meet the schedule established by the county for inclusion of those items on the county general tax bill. The parcel description may be the parcel number assigned by the county assessor to the parcel. In that case, the standby or availability charge shall become a lien against the parcel of land to which it is charged in the same manner as the county general taxes. Penalties may be collected for late payment of the standby or availability charge, or the amount thereof unpaid, in the manner and at the same rates as that applicable for late payment or the amount thereof unpaid of county general taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of municipal ad valorem taxes are applicable to those charges, except that, if any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of the taxes would become delinquent, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to the real property and the charge relating to the property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

If the district collects standby charges through the county general tax bill, the amount of the standby charge and any applicable penalty shall be stated on the tax bill separately from all other taxes, if practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bonds [55520. - 55679.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance and Sale [55520. - 55534.]

55520.

The board may issue and sell the bonds of the district, when authorized, at not less than par value, and the proceeds of the sale shall be placed in the county treasury or other depository for the district’s fund to the credit of the proper district fund and shall be applied exclusively to the purposes and objects mentioned in the ordinance or resolution ordering the holding of the bond election; provided, however, that when said purposes and objects have been accomplished any moneys remaining in said fund shall be transferred to the general fund of the district and may be used by the board for any lawful purpose of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55521.

The board by an order entered upon its minutes, shall, subject to the provisions of this division, prescribe the form of bonds issued and of the interest coupons attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55522.

The board shall designate an amount, not less than one-fortieth of the principal amount of the indebtedness, or series thereof, which shall be paid annually at a fixed time and place, together with the interest on all sums unpaid. The rate of interest shall be designated in the bonds and shall be paid semiannually at a rate not in excess of 8 percent per year; except that interest for the first year after the date of the bonds may be made payable at the end of said year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.

The board may determine and fix a date for the earliest maturity of the principal of the bonds, or series thereof, not more than 10 years from the date of issue of bonds. The principal amount of the indebtedness, or series thereof, must be made payable in not to exceed 40 years from the time of contracting the same; and beginning with the date of earliest maturity of the bonds, or series thereof, not less than one-fortieth of the principal amount of the indebtedness, or series thereof, shall be paid annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

55524.

The bonds shall be issued in such denomination or denominations as the board may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

55525.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board and countersigned by the auditor of the district, or if one has not been appointed, the auditor of the county and the seal of the district shall be affixed thereto. All such signatures and countersignatures, except one, may be printed, lithographed, engraved, or otherwise mechanically reproduced. Any such signature may be affixed in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5500) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55526.

The interest coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the auditor of the county by his engraved or lithographed signature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55527.

In case any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55528.

The principal and interest on the bonds shall be paid by the district treasurer, or if one has not been appointed, the county treasurer, in the manner provided by law for the payment of principal and interest on bonds of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55529.

The board may divide the principal amount of any issue into two or more series and fix different dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of one series may be made payable at different times from those of any other series. The maturity of each series shall comply with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

55530.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, the board may determine that the public economy so requires, and order that less than one-fortieth of the whole amount of the indebtedness, or a series thereof, shall be payable annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1567.)
-------------------------------------------

55531.

District or zone bonds may be made payable on July 1st subsequent to the time fixed for the collection of the second installment of general district taxes with which the first levy of taxes for the payment of the principal or interest of the bonds is to be collected. In such event, the first interest coupons shall be for interest from the date of the bonds of such issue or series to January 1st next prior thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1567.)
-------------------------------------------

55532.

The proceeds of such bonds may be used for the following purposes:

(a) All costs or estimated costs incidental to or connected with the acquisition, construction, improving and financing of the improvements for which they are issued.

(b) All engineering, inspection, legal and fiscal agent’s fees, costs of the bond election and of the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1567.)
-------------------------------------------

55533.

Any bonds issued by the district may be subject to call and redemption prior to maturity at such times and prices and upon such other terms as the board may specify.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1015.)
-------------------------------------------

55534.

When bonds are made callable, a statement to that effect shall be set forth on the face of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Additional Bond Issues [55550. - 55553.]

55550.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness in addition to that incurred at the time of the formation of the district for any of the purposes of the district, the board shall, by resolution, so declare and state the proposition to be submitted to the electors, the purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, the amount of the debt to be incurred, the maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 40 years, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 8 percent per year, payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55551.

The board shall then fix a date upon which an election shall be held for the purpose of authorizing the bonded indebtedness to be incurred, and shall proceed with the election in accordance with Chapter 4 of Part 2 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55552.

If at the election a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the incurring of the bonded indebtedness, then the board shall enter an order to that effect upon its minutes, and shall thereupon be authorized and empowered to issue the bonds of said district for the amount voted, payable out of the funds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55553.

The provisions contained in Articles 1 and 5 of Chapter 2 of this part and Sections 55701, 55703, and 55704, relating to the form of bonds, the issuance and sale of bonds, the validation thereof, and the levying of a tax for the principal and interest thereof, shall apply in like manner to bonds voted and issued as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Refunding Bonds [55580. - 55591.]

55580.

The board may issue refunding bonds of the district for the purpose of refunding any or all outstanding bonds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55581.

The board shall by resolution determine the amount of the outstanding bonds to be refunded, fix the maximum amount of refunding bonds to be issued, the maximum rate of interest to be paid (which shall not exceed the rate of interest on the bonds to be refunded), and the number of years, not exceeding 30, that the refunding bonds or any part thereof are to run.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55582.

In the resolution the board shall call an election and submit to the qualified voters of the district the question whether the refunding bonds should be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55583.

The resolution shall fix the time of the election, establish one or more voting precincts, designate the polling place or places, appoint an inspector, judge, and clerk for each precinct, and fix the hours during the day in which the polls will be open and the manner of voting for and against the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55584.

In all particulars not set forth in this article the election shall be held and conducted as provided in Chapter 4 of Part 2 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55585.

The resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the county designated by the board for that purpose, the last publication to be at least one week before the date of the election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

55586.

If at the election a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the issuance of the refunding bonds, the board shall be authorized to issue refunding bonds of the district not exceeding the maximum amount set forth in the resolution, payable out of the funds of the district to be provided as prescribed in Section 55591.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55587.

The board shall, by order entered in its minutes, prescribe the form of the refunding bonds and of the interest coupons to be attached, and fix the date of the refunding bonds, the date of maturity, and the rate or rates of interest to be paid. The bonds and the interest coupons thereof shall be signed as provided in Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55588.

Refunding bonds may be exchanged at par value for any outstanding bonds to be refunded at their par value or less, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the board and the holders of such bonds, subject to adjustment of accrued interest to the date of exchange. Any moneys required for the adjustment of interest may be paid from any funds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55589.

In lieu of the exchange for outstanding bonds, the refunding bonds may be sold by the board for cash at not less than par and accrued interest, and the proceeds used for the purchase or retirement of the outstanding bonds upon terms agreed upon by the board and the holders of the bonds, but not to exceed par and accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55590.

Any bonds refunded and all interest coupons appurtenant thereto shall be canceled immediately by the county treasurer. Expenses of the refunding proceedings may be paid from any funds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55591.

Taxes for the payment of principal and interest of refunding bonds shall be levied as provided in Chapter 3 of this part except that if the bonds refunded were payable from taxes levied upon land only, the taxes for the payment of principal and interest of refunding bonds shall likewise be levied upon land only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Adoption of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 [55610. - 55610.]

55610.

The Revenue Bond Law of 1941 is applicable to districts for the purpose of financing the production, transmission and distribution of water for public or private purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Validating Proceedings [55630. - 55630.]

55630.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1496.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Bonds as Legal Investments [55640. - 55640.]

55640.

The bonds of the district or those issued for any zone pursuant to this act are entitled to the same force or value or use as bonds issued by any municipality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 406.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Zones [55650. - 55679.]

55650.

Zones may be established within a district for any of the following purposes:

(a) Incurring a bonded indebtedness within the zone sufficient to pay the cost of constructing a water system and any other necessary improvements incidental thereto for the purpose of supplying the inhabitants of the zone with water, where the water system and the improvements, in the judgment of the board, will not be of district-wide benefit, and levying a special tax within the zone for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds.

(b) Fixing and collecting special rates or charges for the use and supply of water furnished by the system of the district within the zone, and applying the receipts from the special rates or charges to the expense of constructing a water system, replacing a water system, acquiring an existing water system, or extending or enlarging the mains of an existing water system, where, in the judgment of the board, the improvement will not be of district-wide benefit.

(c) Incurring a bonded indebtedness and levying a special tax within the zone for payment of the principal and interest on the bonds or fixing and collecting special rates or charges to finance the construction, maintenance, and operation of sewage collection and treatment facilities and disposal of effluent therefrom, where, in the judgment of the board, the improvement will not be of district-wide benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

55651.

Zones may be established within the district by either of the following methods:

(1) A petition for the formation of a zone within a district may be presented to the board, signed by owners representing at least 25 percent of the total assessed valuation of the real property within the proposed zone as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county, or by not less than 25 percent of the taxpayers residing within the proposed zone.

(2) A resolution may be adopted by the board containing the matters required by Section 55652. If bonds are proposed to be issued under the authority of Section 55677, the resolution shall state the amount of the proposed indebtedness, the maximum maturity date, and the maximum interest rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 365.)
-------------------------------------------

55652.

The petition shall contain:

(a) The boundaries of the proposed zone.

(b) A general description of the improvement desired.

(c) An estimate of the cost of the proposed improvement and of the incidental expenses in connection therewith.

(d) Either:

(1) A request that an election be called in the proposed zone for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of establishing the zone and incurring a bonded indebtedness therein, the principal and interest of which shall be paid by special taxes levied on the taxable property in the zone, to pay the cost and expense of the proposed improvement; or

(2) A request that an election be called in the proposed zone for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of establishing the zone and fixing and collecting special rates or charges therein for the use and supply of water and applying the receipts therefrom to the cost and expense of the proposed improvement. If the petition contains such a request, it shall specify the maximum rate or charge permissible and the length of time during which the special rates or charges may be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55653.

The petition shall be accompanied by a map showing the exterior boundaries of the district and of the proposed zone and containing a general description of the proposed improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55654.

The failure of the petition to contain any of the matters specified in Sections 55651 and 55652 shall not affect the legality of the establishment of the zone if it is thereafter established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55655.

The petition shall be presented at a regular meeting of the board, and the board shall thereupon set a time for hearing the petition, which time shall be not less than 21 days nor more than 30 days after the date of presentation of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55656.

Notice of the filing and hearing of the petition shall be given by the clerk of the board by publishing in the county pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code a notice containing a copy of the petition, stating when the petition was filed, and specifying the time set for the hearing of the petition and protests of interested parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

55657.

The clerk shall also cause a notice, similar in substance, to be posted in three of the most public places within the proposed zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55658.

The date set for the hearing shall be at least 13 days after the date of the posting and the date of last publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55659.

A copy of the petition shall be filed with the county engineer of waterworks districts, or district engineer if one has been appointed, at least two weeks before the petition is presented to the board. The county engineer of waterworks districts or district engineer, as the case may be, shall prepare and file with the board, at least one week before the date set for the hearing on the petition, a report containing cost estimates and preliminary plans and specifications for the proposed improvements, together with any recommendations as to the boundaries of the proposed zone, and any other pertinent information relating to the feasibility of the proposed improvements or proposed zone. The engineer’s report shall be available in the office of the board for public inspection, and may be considered by the board at the hearing on the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55660.

At the time fixed for the hearing, the board shall hear and pass upon the petition and any protests in writing that have been filed with the clerk before or at the time set for the hearing, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55661.

If the board determines that the proposed improvement will be of district-wide benefit, the proceedings shall terminate, and the proposed zone shall not be established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55662.

If the board determines that the proposed improvement will not be of district-wide benefit, the board may make such changes in the boundaries of the proposed zone as may be deemed advisable and shall define and establish the boundaries, but shall not modify the boundaries so as to exclude from the proposed zone any territory which will be benefited by the improvement, nor to include in the proposed zone any territory which, in its judgment, will not be benefited by the proposed improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55663.

The board shall not modify the boundaries except after notice of its intention has been published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county and designated by the board for that purpose, describing the proposed modification, and specifying a time for hearing objections to the modification, which time shall be at least 10 days after the publication of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

55664.

Written objections to the proposed modification may be filed with the clerk of the board by any interested person at or before the time set for hearing the objections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55665.

The board shall hear and pass upon the objections at the time appointed, or at any time to which the hearing may be adjourned, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55666.

If the objections, or any of them, be sustained, no further proceedings pursuant to the petition shall be taken, but a new petition for the same or a similar purpose may be filed at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55667.

If no protests are filed, or if all protests filed are heard and denied, or if authorized modifications are made in the boundaries of the proposed zone and the boundaries are finally established, the board shall have jurisdiction to proceed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55668.

If the board determines that the petition is signed by owners representing at least 60 percent of the total assessed valuation of the real property within the proposed zone as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county, or by at least 60 percent of the taxpayers resident within the proposed zone, as its boundaries shall have been established upon the hearing on the petition, the board may by resolution reciting the finding declare that an election is unnecessary and that the zone is established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55668.5.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2201) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation code, or any other provisions of law to the contrary, the board may levy, without an election, a tax rate within a zone to pay the cost of interest and redemption charges on bonded indebtedness incurred prior to July 1, 1974, where a valid petition is presented pursuant to Section 55668.

This section shall only apply the Ventura County Waterworks District No. 1. It is hereby declared to be necessary to enact this special law with respect to such district because of special facts and circumstances existing therein:

It has recently been discovered that due to the lowering of the water table, ranchers in certain areas of Ventura County are threatened with drought and a loss of crops. In order to expedite the provision of water to the areas, the landowners in the areas petitioned for annexation to Ventura County Waterworks District No. 1, for the formation of improvement zones, and for authorization of bonded indebtedness. Registered voters and owners of land approved such actions, and the Board of Supervisors of Ventura County approves. In order to insure, however, that the bonds may be immediately sold without the requirement of an election, it is necessary to exempt the district from the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2201) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code with respect to such bonded indebtedness. Thus, this special law is necessary in order to permit bonds to be sold and water to be provided to the affected areas in time to avoid severe crop losses in the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

55669.

The board shall thereupon be authorized to issue bonds of the zone, to fix and collect special rates or charges, as prayed for in the petition, and proceed with the proposed improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55670.

If the petition for formation of the zone is signed by owners representing less than 60 percent of the total assessed valuation of the real property within the proposed zone as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county, and by less than 60 percent of the taxpayers resident within the proposed zone, as its boundaries shall have been established upon the hearing on the petition, or if for any other reason the board deems it advisable to conduct an election, the board shall by resolution order that a special election be held in the proposed zone to determine whether or not the zone shall be established.
